src/fst/affixes/irregularverbs.lexc
LEXICON FINAL/TODO
    +Sty/TODO:          FINAL ;





! Prefixing notes
!  Marking tones because I may want to do something with them.
!  Might be nice to have an analyzer that returns forms with tones
!  for text to speech, but then strips those for other usages.

! Hmm...
!  Upon collecting forms for iqi and even just part of imi, it seems like
!  it will be annoyign to formulate something nice that isn't repetitive.
!  iqi and imi form General Past Negative in separate ways, apparently;
!  one uses o´ and the other does not.
!
!  But maybe there is a chance for something to arise out of creating an
!  exhaustive list of forms and tags.


!!!!    iqi - Infinitive form is aqoo´n
!!!!            Wa´an ku aqoo´n doonaa 'I will recognize you.'

!  Gen Past - Note same {ŧ} / {đ} / {ñ} pattern
!             Note same 2/3Pl pattern

!   Sg  1        iqiin
!       2       tiqiin
!       3m      yiqiin
!       3f      tiqiin
!   Pl  1       niqiin
!       2       tiqiinneen
!       3       yiqiinneen

! Gen Past Reduced

!   Sg  1        iqii´n
!       2       yiqii´n
!       3m      yiqii´n
!       3f      tiqii´n
!   Pl  1       niqii´n
!       2       yiqii´n
!       3       yiqii´n

! Gen Past Neg

!   ma´ +   oqoo´n (Sg.) / oqooni´n (Pl.)
!
!   Also spelt aqoo´n / aqooni´n
!
!
!   ex.)  Ma´ydin oqooni´n
!        'You (pl.) did not know.'

! Gen Pres                             Gen Pres Reduced

!   Sg  1        aqaan                  Sg  1        aqaa´n
!       2       taqaan                      2       yaqaa´n
!       3m      yaqaan                      3m      yaqaa´n
!       3f      taqaan                      3f      taqaa´n
!   Pl  1       naqaan                  Pl  1       naqaa´n
!       2       taqaanniin                  2       yaqaa´n
!       3       yaqaanniin                  3       yaqaa´n

! Gen Pres (Alternate)                 Gen Pres Reduced Abs (Alternate)

!   Sg  1        aqaannaa               Sg  1        aqaanna´
!       2       taqaannaa                   2       yaqaanna´
!       3m      yaqaannaa                   3m      yaqaanna´
!       3f      taqaannaa                   3f      taqaanna´
!   Pl  1       naqaannaa               Pl  1       naqaanna´
!       2       taqaanniin                  2       yaqaanna´
!       3       yaqaanniin                  3       yaqaanna´

! Gen Pres Negative

!   Sg  1        aqaa´n
!       2       taqaa´n
!       3m      yaqaa´n
!       3f      taqaa´n
!   Pl  1       naqaa´n
!       2       taqaanni´in  ! TODO: ii´n?
!       3       yaqaanni´in  ! TODO: ii´n?


! Progressive forms use the infinitive, and then essentially
! the same morphology as with suffixing verbs.

! Progressive Present              Progressive Present Reduced Abs

!   Sg  1       aqoo´nayaa          Sg  1       aqoo´naya´
!       2       aqoo´naysaa             2       aqoo´naya´
!       3m      aqoo´nayaa              3m      aqoo´naya´
!       3f      aqoo´naysaa             3f      aqoo´naysa´
!   Pl  1       aqoo´naynaa         Pl  1       aqoo´nayna´
!       2       aqoo´naysaan            2       aqoo´naya´
!       3       aqoo´nayaan             3       aqoo´naya´


! Progressive Past                 Progressive Past Reduced Abs

!   Sg  1       aqoo´nayay          Sg  1       aqoo´nayay´
!       2       aqoo´naysay             2       aqoo´nayay´
!       3m      aqoo´nayay              3m      aqoo´nayay´
!       3f      aqoo´naysay             3f      aqoo´naysay´
!   Pl  1       aqoo´naynay         Pl  1       aqoo´naynay´
!       2       aqoo´nayseen            2       aqoo´nayay´
!       3       aqoo´nayeen             3       aqoo´nayay´


! Progressive Present Negative

!   ma´ayo´ + Inf ... or ma´ + typical Prog Pres Neg endings
!       aqoonayso, aqoonayno, etc.

!   ex.)        Ma´ aqoo´nayo´.     I do not recognize her.
!               Oqoo´n ma´ayo´.     I do not recognize her.

! Progressive Past Neg.

!  Invariable form:
!
!   Ma´ oqoonayni´n.        I didn't recognize her.

! Imperative

!       sg.         pl.
!       oqo´ow      oqoo´da

! Negative Imperative

!       sg.         pl.
!       ha o´qoon   ha oqooni´na
!       ha o´qoonin




!!!!    imi - Infinitive form is ima´n
!!!!            Wa´an ku aqoo´n doonaa 'I will recognize you.'

!  Gen Past - Note same {ŧ} / {đ} / {ñ} pattern
!             Note same 2/3Pl pattern

!   Sg  1        imi
!       2       timi
!       3m      yimi
!       3f      timi
!   Pl  1       nimi
!       2       timaaddeen
!       3       yimaaddeen

!  Gen Past (Alternate)

!   Sg  1        imid
!       2       timid
!       3m      yimid
!       3f      timid
!   Pl  1       nimid
!       2       timaaddeen
!       3       yimaaddeen

! Gen Past Reduced Abs

!   Sg  1        imi´            imi´d
!       2       yimi´           yimi´d
!       3m      yimi´           yimi´d
!       3f      timi´           timi´d
!   Pl  1       nimi´           nimi´d
!       2       yimi´           yimi´d
!       3       yimi´           yimi´d

! Gen Past Neg

!   ma´ +   ima´n (Sg.) / imani´n (Pl.)


! Gen Pres

!   Sg  1        imaaddaa
!       2       timaaddaa
!       3m      yimaaddaa
!       3f      timaaddaa
!   Pl  1       nimaadnaa
!       2       timaaddaan
!       3       yimaaddaan

! Gen Pres Reduced Abs

!   Sg  1        imaadda´
!       2       yimaadda´
!       3m      yimaadda´
!       3f      timaadda´
!   Pl  1       nimaadna´
!       2       yimaadda´
!       3       yimaadda´

! Gen Pres Neg

!   Sg  1        imaaddo´
!       2       timaaddo´
!       3m      yimaaddo´
!       3f      timaaddo´
!   Pl  1       nimaadno´
!       2       timaadda´an      ! TODO: aa´n?
!       3       yimaadda´an     ! TODO: aa´n?


! Progressive: inf + typical progressive endings.

! TODO: collect these from Orwin anyway, p. 152



! Inf - oo´lli?

! Gen Past

!   Sg  1        iil
!       2       tiil
!       3m      yiil
!       3f      tiil
!   Pl  1       niil
!       2       tiilleen
!       3       yiilleen

! Negative Gen Past

! oo´l / oolli´n 'be in a place'


! Gen Past Reduced Abs

!   Sg  1        ii´l
!       2       yii´l
!       3m      yii´l
!       3f      tii´l
!   Pl  1       nii´l
!       2       yii´l
!       3       yii´l




! Gen Pres

!   Sg  1        aal
!       2       taal
!       3m      yaal
!       3f      taal
!   Pl  1       naal
!       2       taalliin
!       3       yaalliin

! Gen Pres Alternative

!   Sg  1        aallaa
!       2       taallaa
!       3m      yaallaa
!       3f      taallaa
!   Pl  1       naallaa
!       2       taallaan
!       3       yaallaan

! Gen Pres Reduced

!   Sg  1        aa´l
!       2       yaa´l
!       3m      yaa´l
!       3f      taa´l
!   Pl  1       naa´l
!       2       yaa´l
!       3       yaa´l

! Gen Pres Reduced Alternative

!   Sg  1        aalla´
!       2       yaalla´
!       3m      yaalla´
!       3f      taalla´
!   Pl  1       naalla´
!       2       yaalla´
!       3       yaalla´

! Gen Pres Neg

!   Sg  1        aa´l
!       2       taa´l
!       3m      yaa´l
!       3f      taa´l
!   Pl  1       naa´l
!       2       taalli´in
!       3       yaalli´in


! Progressive Present              Progressive Present Reduced

!   Sg  1       oo´llayaa           Sg  1       oo´llaya´
!       2       oo´llaysaa              2       oo´llaya´
!       3m      oo´llayaa               3m      oo´llaya´
!       3f      oo´llaysaa              3f      oo´llaysa´
!   Pl  1       oo´llaynaa          Pl  1       oo´llayna´
!       2       oo´llaysaan             2       oo´llaya´
!       3       oo´llayaan              3       oo´llaya´


! Progressive Past                 Progressive Past Reduced

!   Sg  1       oo´llayay           Sg  1       oo´llayay´
!       2       oo´llaysay              2       oo´llayay´
!       3m      oo´llayay               3m      oo´llayay´
!       3f      oo´llaysay              3f      oo´llaysay´
!   Pl  1       oo´llaynay          Pl  1       oo´llaynay´
!       2       oo´llayseen             2       oo´llayay´
!       3       oo´llayeen              3       oo´llayay´



! Imperative

!           sg              pl
!   pos     o´ol                oo´lla
!   neg     ha oo´llin      ha oolli´na


! Lexical notes:

! yiil - be in a place, inanimate. may use ku´.
!       Ku´rsi ba´a mi´iska gee´sti´isa yaalla´.
!       'There is a chair at the side of the table.'
!
!       'Ka´badhku qo´lka bu´u yiil.'
!       'The cupboard was in the room.'
!


! joog - be in a place, people, animals. no prep.
!       Xaggee´ ba´y joogaan?       Where are they?
!       Gu´riga ba´y joogaan.


! jir - be in a place, people, animals, inanimate. may use ku´.
!
!       Ka´badh ba´a qo´lka ku´ jira´. 'There is a cupboard in the room.
!       Gaba´dhu du´gsiga ku´ ma´ jirto´. 'The girl is not in the school.
!
!       jir is more existential, yiil is more about being located somewhere.


LEXICON OOLLI
    +Inf:oo´lli FINAL ; ! aqoo´n ! check inf form
    +Ind+Past:  OOLLI/GenPast ;
    +Ind+Past:  OOLLI/GenPastRedAbs ; ! +Red tag after
    +Neg+Past:  OOLLI/GenPastNeg ;

    +Ind+Pres:  OOLLI/GenPres ;
    +Ind+Pres:  OOLLI/GenPresRedAbs ; ! +Red tag after
    +Ind+Pres:  OOLLI/GenPresRel ; ! +Rel tag after
    +Neg+Pres:  OOLLI/GenPresNeg ;

    +Ind+Pres:  OOLLI/GenPresAlt ;
    +Ind+Pres:  OOLLI/GenPresRedAbsAlt ; ! +Red tag after

    +Imp:       OOLLI/Imp ;

    ! Barrier and  necessary for Prog.
    :oo´ll%>        Progressive ; ! ima´n ; TODO: +Ind tag comes in at some odd place.
    +Neg+Prog+Pres:oo´llin          FINAL ;     ! oqoo´n
    +Neg+Prog+Past:TODO     FINAL ;     ! oqoonayni´n


! Following lexicons only have Person, Reduced and Sty tags.
LEXICON OOLLI/GenPast
      +1Sg:0%<iil           Clitics ;
     +2Sg:t%<iil            Clitics ;
    +3SgM:y%<iil            Clitics ;
    +3SgF:t%<iil            Clitics ;
     +1Pl:n%<iil            Clitics ;
     +2Pl:t%<iilleen        Clitics ;
     +3Pl:y%<iilleen        Clitics ;

LEXICON OOLLI/GenPastRedAbs
      +1Sg+Red+Abs:0%<ii´l          Clitics ; !  ii´l
     +2Sg+Red+Abs:y%<ii´l           Clitics ; ! yii´l
    +3SgM+Red+Abs:y%<ii´l           Clitics ; ! yii´l
    +3SgF+Red+Abs:t%<ii´l           Clitics ; ! tii´l
     +1Pl+Red+Abs:n%<ii´l           Clitics ; ! lii´l
     +2Pl+Red+Abs:y%<ii´l           Clitics ; ! yii´l
     +3Pl+Red+Abs:y%<ii´l           Clitics ; ! yii´l

! TODO: this
LEXICON OOLLI/GenPastNeg
    +Sg:oqoo´n               Clitics ; ! oqoo´n
    +Pl:oqooni´n             Clitics ; ! oqooni´n
    +Sg+Sty/TODO:aqoo´n      Clitics ; ! aqoo´n
    +Pl+Sty/TODO:aqooni´n   Clitics ; ! aqooni´n

LEXICON OOLLI/GenPres
     +1Sg:0%<aal            Clitics ;
     +2Sg:t%<aal          Clitics ;
    +3SgM:y%<aal          Clitics ;
    +3SgF:t%<aal          Clitics ;
     +1Pl:n%<aal          Clitics ;
     +2Pl:t%<aal%>liin      Clitics ;
     +3Pl:y%<aal%>liin      Clitics ;

! TODO: LEXICON OOLLI/GenPresRedNom

LEXICON OOLLI/GenPresRedAbs
     +1Sg+Red+Abs:0%<aa´l         Clitics ;   !  aa´l
     +2Sg+Red+Abs:y%<aa´l         Clitics ;   ! yaa´l
    +3SgM+Red+Abs:y%<aa´l         Clitics ;   ! yaa´l
    +3SgF+Red+Abs:t%<aa´l         Clitics ;   ! taa´l
     +1Pl+Red+Abs:n%<aa´l         Clitics ;   ! naa´l
     +2Pl+Red+Abs:y%<aa´l         Clitics ;   ! yaa´l
     +3Pl+Red+Abs:y%<aa´l         Clitics ;   ! yaa´l

LEXICON OOLLI/GenPresNeg
     +1Sg:0%<aa´l         Clitics ;     !  aa´l
     +2Sg:t%<aa´l         Clitics ;     ! taa´l
    +3SgM:y%<aa´l         Clitics ;     ! yaa´l
    +3SgF:t%<aa´l         Clitics ;     ! taa´l
     +1Pl:n%<aa´l         Clitics ;     ! naa´l
     +2Pl:t%<aal%>li´in     Clitics ;     ! taalli´in
     +3Pl:y%<aal%>li´in     Clitics ;     ! yaalli´in
